Utah statutes.
4-9-5.3.   Adopting uniform regulation for the method of sale of
commodities.
Unless modified by the department, the Uniform Regulation for the Method of
Sale of Commodities, adopted by the National Conference on Weights and
Measures, in Handbook 130, Uniform Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal
Metrology and Engine Fuel Quality, National Institute of Standards and
Technology, shall apply to the method of sale of commodities in the state.
